Utah statutes.
63B-22-201.   Authorizations to design and construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Southern Utah University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use up to $30,000,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Center for the Arts with up to 80,490 square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(2)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use up to $11,040,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Renovation and Addition of Phase II of the Kennecott Building with up to 40,700 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may use state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(3)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use up to $8,000,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Science and Technology Building at Utah State University Tooele with up to 26,000 square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may use state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(4)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Department of Public Safety may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use up to $1,277,000 in nonlapsing balances to plan, design, and construct a Drivers License Building in Price with up to 7,000 square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the department may use state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.



Enacted by Chapter 409, 2013 General Session

